Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3914.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin STANDARDIZED TESTING OPT-OUT.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, for the 2025-2026 and 2026-2027 school years only, a school district or charter school board may opt out of all statewide assessments, including alternate assessments and English language proficiency assessments, due to the effects of federal Immigration and Customs Enforcement activity on students, staff, and the school community. A school district or charter school must notify the commissioner of education as soon as practicable of their decision to opt out of testing. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end